Washington statutes.
RCW 4.68.030

Affidavit must accompany summons.

The summons must be accompanied by an affidavit of the plaintiff, his or her agent, representative, or attorney, that the judgment, or some part thereof, remains unsatisfied, and must specify the amount due thereon.

[ 2011 c 336 s 115; Code 1881 s 316; 1877 p 65 s 320; RRS s 438.]